trunk/apertium-en-ca/apertium-en-ca.en.metadix
    <pardef n="cact/us__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -us and add -i or -es (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>uses</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zebra__n">
      <e c="CP: singular spelling">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: plural spelling: add -s">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural spelling (not very common): invariable singular form">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BBC__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cent/re__n">
      <e c="CP: en_US/en_GB dialect variation" v="en_US">
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>re</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e v="en_GB">
        <i>re</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="col/our__n">
      <e c="CP: en_US/en_GB dialect variation" v="en_US">
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>our</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e v="en_GB">
        <i>our</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="globali/sation__n">
      <e c="CP: en_US/en_GB dialect variation" v="en_US">
        <p>
          <l>zation</l>
          <r>sation</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e v="en_GB">
        <i>sation</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Korea__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mars__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="United_States__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="James__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mary__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Smith__np">
      <e c="CP: paradigm for family names">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>s'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bush__np">
      <e c="CP: paradigm for family names">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Gauss__np">
      <e c="CP: paradigm for family names">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Linux__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="United_Nations__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="one__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="two__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>hundred</l>
          <r><b/>hundred<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>thousand</l>
          <r><b/>thousand<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="million__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="twenty__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-one</l>
          <r>-one</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-two</l>
          <r>-two</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-three</l>
          <r>-three</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-four</l>
          <r>-four</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-five</l>
          <r>-five</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-six</l>
          <r>-six</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-seven</l>
          <r>-seven</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-eight</l>
          <r>-eight</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-nine</l>
          <r>-nine</r>
        </p>
        <par n="two__num"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Nazaria"><i>Nazaria</i><par n="Mary__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Jeunesse"><i>Jeunesse</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Beltrán"><i>Beltrán</i><par n="Mark__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Demosthenes"><i>Demosthenes</i><par n="James__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Natal"><i>Natal</i><par n="Mark__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Dakota"><i>Dakota</i><par n="Korea__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Jayden"><i>Jayden</i><par n="Mark__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Carolina"><i>Carolina</i><par n="Korea__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Mckayla"><i>Mckayla</i><par n="Mary__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Mcguiness"><i>Mcguiness</i><par n="Bush__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Power"><i>Power</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Procter"><i>Procter</i><par n="Smith__np"/>    </e>
    <e>      <i>Dimas</i><par n="Bush__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Aleutian Islands"><i>Aleutian<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Falklands"><i>Falklands</i><par n="United_States__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Francis"><i>Francis</i><par n="James__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Islamabad"><i>Islamabad</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Korea"><i>Korea</i><par n="Korea__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Luis"><i>Luis</i><par n="James__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Marseilles"><i>Marseilles</i><par n="Mars__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="United Nations"><i>United<b/>Nations</i><par n="United_Nations__np"/></e>
    <e lm="epicentre"><i>epicent</i><par n="cent/re__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="flavour"><i>flav</i><par n="col/our__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="focus"><i>foc</i><par n="cact/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="legalisation"><i>legali</i><par n="globali/sation__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="litre of alcohol"><i>lit</i><par n="cent/re__n"/><p><l><b/>of<b/>alcohol</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>alcohol</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="millimetre"><i>millimet</i><par n="cent/re__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="neighbour" c="UE"><i>neighb</i><par n="col/our__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="nucleus" a="carmentano"><i>nucle</i><par n="cact/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="partridge"><i>partridge</i><par n="zebra__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="seed"><i>seed</i><par n="zebra__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="visualisation"><i>visuali</i><par n="globali/sation__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="watercolour"><i>watercol</i><par n="col/our__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="zebra"><i>zebra</i><par n="zebra__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ETA"><i>ETA</i><par n="BBC__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="FBI" a="doriua"><i>FBI</i><par n="BBC__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="one"><i>one</i><par n="one__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="a million"><i>a<b/>million</i><par n="million__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="one hundred"><i>one<b/>hundred</i><par n="million__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="million"><i>million</i><par n="million__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="two"><i>two</i><par n="two__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ten"><i>ten</i><par n="two__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="eighteen"><i>eighteen</i><par n="two__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="forty"><i>forty</i><par n="twenty__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sixty"><i>sixty</i><par n="twenty__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="eighty"><i>eighty</i><par n="twenty__num"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Fortune 500"><i>Fortune<b/>500</i><par n="Linux__np"/>  </e>
    <e lm="Abyssinia"><i>Abyssinia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Appalachians"><i>Appalachians</i><par n="Mars__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="cul-de-sac"><i>cul-de-sac</i><par n="zebra__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="tyndallization"><i>tyndalli</i><par n="globali/sation__n"/></e>
<e lm="Wales"><i>Wales</i><par n="Mars__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ice cream parlour"><i>ice<b/>cream<b/>parl</i><par n="col/our__n"/></e>
    <e lm="work centre"><i>work<b/>cent</i><par n="cent/re__n"/></e>
    <e lm="RAM" a="greenbreen"><i>RAM</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cactus" a="greenbreen"><i>cact</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Indies" a="greenbreen"><i>Indies</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Eratosthenes" a="greenbreen"><i>Eratosthenes</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Erdős" a="greenbreen"><i>Erdős</i><par n="Gauss__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Higgs" a="greenbreen"><i>Higgs</i><par n="Gauss__np"/></e>
    <e lm="IUPAC" a="greenbreen"><i>IUPAC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Descartes" a="greenbreen"><i>Descartes</i><par n="Gauss__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Constable" a="greenbreen"><i>Constable</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Juárez"><i>Juárez</i><par n="Bush__np"/></e>
<e lm="Virginia" a="doriua"><i>Virginia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Laredo RC" a="eleka"><i>Laredo<b/>RC</i><par n="Linux__np"/>    </e>
     <e lm="Fishermen's museum" a="eleka"><i>Fishermen's<b/>museum</i><par n="Linux__np"/>    </e>
